California statutes. Public Resources Code
(c) (1) If the commission sets a maximum gross gasoline refining margin under subdivision (b), it shall also establish a penalty for exceeding that maximum margin, by regulation or order at a business meeting, subject to the requirements of subdivision (f), that may be the same meeting described in subdivision (b).

(2) The penalty shall be a percentage of the amount by which the refiner’s gross gasoline refining margin excluding state program costs exceeds the maximum gross gasoline refining margin, converted from dollars per barrel to dollars per gallon, multiplied by the number of gallons sold by the refiner during the calendar month for
 all transactions described in paragraph (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 25355.

(3) Subject to subdivision (j), the penalty shall be tiered, such that the penalty percentage shall increase with the amount by which the refiner’s gross gasoline refining margin excluding state program costs exceeds the maximum gross gasoline refining margin, as follows:

(A) Amounts earned by a refiner that exceed the maximum gross gasoline refining margin by less than ten cents ($0.10) per gallon shall be subject to the base penalty percentage set by the commission.

(B) Amounts earned by a refiner that exceed the maximum gross gasoline refining margin by ten cents ($0.10) to twenty cents ($0.20), inclusive, per gallon shall be subject to a penalty percentage higher than the base penalty percentage.

(C) Amounts earned by a refiner that exceed the maximum gross gasoline refining margin by more than twenty cents ($0.20) per gallon shall be subject to a penalty percentage higher than the penalty percentage set under subparagraph (B).

(d) In establishing a maximum gross gasoline refining margin and penalty, the commission shall consider information reported under subdivision (b) of Section 25355 and any other public data and reports that it determines will assist its analysis. The commission shall also consider confidential information submitted pursuant to Sections 25354 and 25355. A refiner may submit additional information and facts for the commission to consider under an application for confidential designation pursuant to Section 25364.

(e) The commission shall not set a maximum gross gasoline refining margin or
 accompanying penalty under subdivisions (b) and (c), respectively, unless it finds that the likely benefits to consumers outweigh the potential costs to consumers. In making that determination, the commission shall consider all factors that in its discretion it deems relevant, including at a minimum all of the following factors, although no one factor shall be determinative:

(1) Whether it is likely that the maximum gross gasoline refining margin and penalty will lead to a greater imbalance between supply and demand in the California transportation fuels market than would exist without the maximum margin and penalty.

(2) Whether it is likely that the maximum gross gasoline refining margin and penalty will lead to higher average prices at the pump on an annual basis than would exist without the maximum margin and penalty.

(3) Whether case-by-case exemptions from the gross gasoline refining maximum margin will be sufficient to ensure that individual refiners have an opportunity to demonstrate the need for a greater margin before they make decisions about production.

(f) Decisions of the commission under subdivision (b) to adopt a regulation or order setting a maximum gross gasoline refining margin, under subdivision (c) to adopt a regulation or order establishing a penalty for exceeding the maximum gross gasoline refining margin, under subdivision (e) regarding the benefits and costs to consumers, and under subdivision (k) regarding adjustments to, or rescission of, the maximum gross gasoline refining margin or penalty, shall be made in accordance with all of the following procedures:

(1) A notice and draft decision, regulation, or order shall be posted publicly at least 30 days before
 the business meeting at which adoption of the decision, regulation, or order will be considered.

(2) The commission shall receive written comments on the draft decision, regulation, or order.

(3) The commission shall hear public comment on the draft decision, regulation, or order at its business meeting.

(g) If the commission has set a maximum gross gasoline refining margin and penalty, the margin and penalty shall take effect 60 days following the commission’s regulation or order establishing the margin and penalty pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c), respectively. Within 15 days of the regulation or order establishing a maximum gross gasoline refining margin and penalty, the commission shall notify refiners by a means determined by the commission that may include, but is not limited to, mail, email, or internet
 website posting.

(h) If the commission has set a maximum gross gasoline refining margin under subdivision (b), it shall be a violation of this section for a refiner to exceed the maximum gross gasoline refining margin.

(i) In addition to any other remedy that may be available, the commission may petition a court to enjoin a refiner from violating this section.

(j) The commission may impose an administrative civil penalty for a violation of this section in the amounts established pursuant to subdivision (c).

(k) The commission may, by regulation or order, at a business meeting, subject to the requirements of subdivision (f), rescind or adjust the maximum gross gasoline refining margin and the penalty percentages and amounts specified in subdivisions (b)
 and (c) to ensure that a sufficient, affordable, and fairly priced supply of gasoline is available to Californians. A refiner may submit information and facts for the commission to consider in support of any rescission or adjustment under an application for confidential designation pursuant to Section 25364. Rescission of, or adjustments to, the maximum gross gasoline refining margin and the penalty percentages and amounts specified in subdivisions (b) and (c), respectively, pursuant to this subdivision shall be effective on the first day of the calendar month at least 15 days after the commission gives public notice of the rescission or adjustment, unless the commission orders otherwise.

(l) Notwithstanding Section 25901 and except as provided in subdivision (n), a petition for writ of mandate pursuant to Section 1085 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall be the exclusive remedy available to challenge any regulation, order, decision,
 rule, guideline, or adjudication of an exemption request adopted by the commission under this section. The court’s review shall be limited exclusively to the record before the commission. Any petition shall be filed within 30 days of the commission’s decision.

(m) (1) The commission shall consider a refiner’s request for an exemption from the maximum gross gasoline refining margin and shall grant the exemption upon a showing by the refiner, based on competent and reliable evidence and subject to the commission’s review, examination, and investigation of the evidence, that an application of the maximum gross gasoline refining margin would be unconstitutional as applied to the refiner. The commission may, in its discretion, grant a request for an exemption upon a showing by the refiner of good cause for an exemption, subject to alternative maximum margins or other conditions as the commission may set.

(2) Any refiner seeking an exemption shall, at a minimum, file a statement with the commission, signed under penalty of perjury, setting forth the facts that form the basis for the request for exemption. A refiner may submit information and facts under an application for confidential designation pursuant to Section 25364 to support its application for an exemption.

(n) (1) Before imposing the administrative civil penalty under subdivision (j), the executive director of the commission shall issue and serve a complaint on the refiner, and the commission shall hold a hearing, adopt a decision, and require payment of the penalty in accordance with the procedures described in subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, of Section 25534.1.

(2) Judicial review and enforcement of an order imposing an
 administrative civil penalty under subdivision (j) may be had in accordance with the procedures described in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 25534.2.

(3) Penalties collected under this section shall be deposited into the Price Gouging Penalty Fund, which is hereby created in the State Treasury and shall be used, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to address any consequences of price gouging on Californians.

(4) The commission shall make public, on a quarterly basis, the name and address of each refiner that has exceeded the maximum gross gasoline refining margin for any month during the previous quarter, and the amount of administrative civil penalty to be assessed.

(o) The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) does
 not apply to any regulation, order, decision, rule, guideline, adjudication of an exemption request, or adjustment of the maximum gross gasoline margin, adopted by the commission under this section.

(p) The California State Auditor shall begin, no earlier than January 1, 2032, and complete, no later than March 1, 2033, an audit and performance review of the maximum gross gasoline refining margin and penalty set pursuant to this section. The California State Auditor shall make determinations in a report to the Legislature and the commission, by no later than June 1, 2033, as to whether this section is achieving the intended goal to reduce gasoline price spikes and stabilize the gasoline fuel supply market for California consumers. Within 60 days of the issuance of the report, the commission shall hear from the California State Auditor at a business meeting of the commission. If the California State Auditor concludes that the maximum gross
 gasoline refining margin and penalty should be terminated, then the commission shall cease implementing the maximum gross gasoline refining margin and penalty provisions no later than 180 days after the issuance of the report, unless the Legislature has enacted subsequent legislation to extend the maximum gross gasoline refining margin and penalty provisions in the meantime.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2023, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 5) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 53, Sec. 3.   (SB 124)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

25355.7.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, on or before March 1, 2024, and March 1 of each year thereafter, the commission, in cooperation with the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, shall submit a report to the Legislature, in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, that includes a review of the price of gasoline in California and its impact on state revenues for the previous calendar year.

(b) (1) (A) To facilitate the report required in subdivision (a) and to assist the commission in providing independent analysis and oversight of the market for transportation fuels, and in identifying potential market design flaws and market power abuses, the
 California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may, notwithstanding any other law, use any information that comes into its possession and may request from any person records required to be maintained pursuant to Section 7053 or 8301 of the Revenue and Taxation Code or any other records in a person’s possession, custody, or control that the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration deems necessary for these purposes. Records that the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may request, include, but are not limited to, sales prices and contracts for unbranded rack sales, branded rack sales, bulk sales, spot pipeline sales, dealer tankwagon sales, imported fuel transactions, and retail sales of gasoline meeting California specifications, including prices per gallon of gasoline charged by retailers by retail location and by grade of gasoline.

(B) Except as provided in paragraph (4), the information, including, but not
 limited to, business affairs or trade secrets, provided to the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration pursuant to this section shall constitute confidential information for purposes of Section 7056 of the Revenue and Taxation Code or Section 15570.84 of the Government Code and shall not be subject to public disclosure.

(2) (A) The records requested pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be provided in the form and manner specified by the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration within 30 days of the notice of request.

(B) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall provide written notification to the commission within 10 days after the failure or refusal of any person to provide information or records in the time and manner as specified pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(3) For purposes of the report required by subdivision (a), the commission may impose a civil penalty after receiving notification from the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration that a person has failed or refused to provide information or records in the time and manner as required. A civil penalty under this subdivision shall be imposed under the procedures set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 25362, except that the maximum penalty amount shall be ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per day.

(4) (A) Notwithstanding any other law, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may provide any information provided to it by any person pursuant to this subdivision to the commission, to the Attorney General, to any contractor retained to prepare reports required by this section, or any entity that the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may contract with for the purpose of
 preparing the reports required by this section. The Attorney General may request from the commission or the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration any information collected pursuant to Section 25354 or 25355 or this section, or Chapter 4.6 (commencing with Section 25730).

(B) Except as provided in subdivision (c), the information, including, but not limited to, business affairs or trade secrets, provided pursuant to this paragraph shall be confidential and shall not be subject to public disclosure by the commission, the Attorney General, any contractor retained to prepare the reports required by this section, or the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration or its contractors.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the reports required by this section shall only disclose confidential taxpayer information presented in aggregate form to the extent necessary to
 ensure confidentiality if public disclosure of the specific information or data would result in unfair competitive disadvantage to the person supplying the information or would adversely affect market competition.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 6.   (SB 2 1x)   Effective June 26, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

25356.

(a) The commission, utilizing its own staff and other support staff having expertise and experience in, or with, the petroleum industry, shall gather, analyze, and interpret the information submitted to it pursuant to Section 25354 and other information relating to the supply and price of petroleum products, with particular emphasis on motor vehicle fuels, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) The nature, cause, and extent of any petroleum or petroleum products shortage or condition affecting supply.

(2) The economic and environmental impacts of any petroleum and petroleum product shortage or condition affecting supply.

(3) Petroleum or petroleum product demand and supply forecasting methodologies utilized by the petroleum industry in California.

(4) The prices, with particular emphasis on retail motor fuel prices, including sales to unbranded retail markets, and any significant changes in prices charged by the petroleum industry for petroleum or petroleum products sold in California and the reasons for those changes.

(5) The profits, both before and after taxes, of the industry as a whole and of major firms within it, including a comparison with other major industry groups and major firms within them as to profits, return on equity and capital, and price-earnings ratio.

(6) The emerging trends relating to supply, demand, and conservation of petroleum and petroleum products.

(7) The nature and extent of efforts of the petroleum industry to expand refinery capacity and to make acquisitions of additional supplies of petroleum and petroleum products, including activities relative to the exploration, development, and extraction of resources within the state.

(8) The development of a petroleum and petroleum products information system in a manner that will enable the state to take action to meet and mitigate any petroleum or petroleum products shortage or condition affecting supply.

(b) The commission shall analyze the impacts of state and federal policies and regulations upon the supply and pricing of petroleum products.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 288, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25357.

The commission shall obtain and analyze monthly production reports prepared by the State Oil and Gas Supervisor pursuant to Section 3227.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1055, Sec. 4.   Effective September 26, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

25358.

(a) Within 70 days after the end of each preceding quarter of each calendar year, the commission shall publish and submit to the Governor and the Legislature a summary, an analysis, and an interpretation of the information submitted to it pursuant to Section 25354 and information reviewed pursuant to Section 25357. This report shall be separate from the report submitted pursuant to Section 25322. Any person may submit comments in writing regarding the accuracy or sufficiency of the information submitted.

(b) The commission shall prepare a biennial assessment of the information provided pursuant to this chapter and shall include its assessment in the biennial fuels report prepared pursuant to Section 25310.

(c) The commission may use reasonable means necessary and available to it to seek and obtain any facts, figures, and other information from any source for the purpose of preparing and providing reports to the Governor and the Legislature. The commission shall specifically include in the reports its analysis of any unsuccessful attempts in obtaining information from potential sources, including the lack of cooperation or refusal to provide information.

(d) Whenever the commission fails to provide any report required pursuant to this section within the specified time, it shall provide to all members of the Legislature, within five days of the specified time, a detailed written explanation of the cause of any delay.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1184, Sec. 6.5.)
-------------------------------------------

25362.

(a) The commission shall notify those persons who have failed to timely provide the information specified in Section 25354 or 25355. If, within five days after being notified of the failure to provide the specified information, the person fails to supply the specified information, the person shall be subject to a civil penalty of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) nor more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) per day for each day the submission of information is refused or delayed, up to a maximum penalty of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) per submission.

(b) A person who willfully makes any false statement, representation, or certification in any record, report, plan, or other document filed with the commission shall be subject to a civil
 penalty not to exceed forty thousand dollars ($40,000).

(c) The administration of civil penalties under this section shall be subject to the procedures provided in Section 25534.1, and to the procedures for judicial review under Section 25534.2.

(d) In addition to any civil penalty provided for by this section, if a person fails to timely provide the information specified in Section 25354 or 25355, the commission may petition a court for an order compelling the person to provide that information.

(e) For purposes of this section, the term “person” shall mean, in addition to the definition contained in Section 25116, any responsible corporate officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 7.   (SB 2 1x)   Effective June 26, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

25364.

(a) A person required to present information to the commission pursuant to Section 25354 or 25355 or a person making a request for exemption pursuant to Section 25355.5 may request that specific information be held in confidence. Information requested to be held in confidence shall be presumed to be confidential.

(b) Information presented to the commission pursuant to Section 25354, 25355, or 25355.5 shall be held in confidence by the commission or aggregated to the extent necessary to ensure confidentiality if public disclosure of the specific information or data would result in unfair competitive disadvantage to the person supplying the information or would adversely affect
 market competition.

(c) (1) Whenever the commission receives a request to publicly disclose unaggregated information, or otherwise proposes to publicly disclose information submitted pursuant to Section 25354, 25355, or 25355.5, notice of the request or proposal shall be provided to the person submitting the information. The notice shall indicate the form in which the information is to be released. Upon receipt of notice, the person submitting the information shall have 10 working days in which to respond to the notice to justify the claim of confidentiality on each specific item of information covered by the notice on the basis that public disclosure of the specific information would result in unfair competitive disadvantage to the person supplying the information or would adversely affect market
 competition.

(2) The commission shall consider the respondent’s submittal in determining whether to publicly disclose the information
 submitted to it to which a claim of confidentiality is made. The commission shall issue a written decision that sets forth its reasons for making the determination whether each item of information for which a claim of confidentiality is made shall remain confidential or shall be publicly disclosed.

(d) The commission shall not make public disclosure of information submitted to it pursuant to Section 25354, 25355, or 25355.5 within 10 working days after the commission has issued its written decision required in this section.

(e) Information submitted to the commission pursuant to Section 25354, 25355, or 25355.5 shall not be deemed confidential if the person submitting the information or data has made it public.

(f) With respect to petroleum products and blendstocks reported by type pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 25354, information provided pursuant to subdivision (h) or (i) of Section 25354, and information provided under Section 25355, the commission, the State Air Resources Board, or the Attorney General, or any employee or contractor of those entities, shall not do any of the following:

(1) Use the information furnished under paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 25354, under subdivision (h) or (i) of Section 25354, or under Section 25355 for any purpose other than law enforcement or the statistical purposes for which it is supplied.

(2) Make any publication whereby the information furnished by any particular establishment or
 individual under paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 25354, under subdivision (h) or (i) of Section 25354, or under Section 25355 can be identified.

(3) Permit anyone other than commission members, the State Air Resources Board, the Attorney General, and employees or contractors of those entities to examine the individual reports provided under paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 25354, under subdivision (h) or (i) of Section 25354, or under Section 25355.

(g) Notwithstanding any other law, the commission may disclose confidential information received pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 25304, or Section 25354 or 25355 to the State Air Resources Board or the Attorney General if the state board or the Attorney General agrees to keep the
 information confidential. With respect to the information it receives, the state board and the Attorney General shall be subject to all pertinent provisions of this section.

(h) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, the commission shall, upon request, timely disclose confidential information received pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 25304 or Section 25354 or 25355, or data provided under a contract entered into pursuant to Section 25367 or 25373, to the Speaker of the Assembly, the Senate Committee on Rules, the appropriate policy committees in the Assembly or the Senate, or staff members of each, provided that the information shall be provided only in aggregated or otherwise anonymized form, and each individual person receiving or having access to the information shall first agree, in writing, to keep the
 information confidential. Any person or committee receiving information under this subdivision shall be subject to all pertinent provisions of this section.

(2) Aggregated or otherwise anonymized information disclosed under paragraph (1) shall be made available by the commission to the public no more than quarterly, upon request of the Speaker of the Assembly, the Senate Committee on Rules, or the appropriate policy committees in the Assembly or the Senate, under conditions as the commission may determine are necessary to ensure that public disclosure of the specific information would not result in unfair competitive disadvantage to the person supplying the information or adversely affect market competition.

(i) Notwithstanding any other law, the commission may disclose confidential
 information received pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 25354 to the administrator for oil spill response, appointed pursuant to Section 8670.4 of the Government Code, upon request for oil spill planning and preparedness purposes, and to first responders in the event of an accident or spill. Information disclosed to the administrator or first responders pursuant to this subdivision that has been identified as confidential under subdivision (a) shall not be disclosed to any other entity except pursuant to a request in accordance with the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code). Upon receipt of a records request seeking information disclosed pursuant to this subdivision, the administrator or first responder receiving the request shall provide the destination facility who provided the confidential information
 to the commission with an opportunity to submit, within a reasonable time, a response and information in support of exemption from disclosure before making the determination whether the requested records are exempt from disclosure. A requirement or deadline contained in the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) shall not be extended or waived as a result of this subdivision.

(j) This section does not apply to aggregate data that are required to be posted on the commission’s internet website pursuant to subdivision
 (c) of Section 25355.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 5.   (AB 1 2x)   Effective January 13, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

25366.

Any confidential information pertinent to the responsibilities of the commission specified in this division which is obtained by another state agency shall be available to the commission and shall be treated in a confidential manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1055, Sec. 4.   Effective September 26, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

25367.

(a) Except as otherwise provided, the adoption of, or amendment to, regulations or orders implementing this chapter shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law as an emergency, and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, and general welfare. Notwithstanding any other law, the emergency regulations or orders adopted to implement this chapter shall remain in effect for two years. Although the commission may adopt regulations to further define terms or prescribe reporting procedures or calculation methodologies pursuant to this chapter, or prescribe any other method of implementing this chapter, the provisions of this chapter are self-executing and shall not require any implementing regulation
 to be effective.

(b) The commission may enter into contracts to implement this chapter, and the contracts shall not require the review, consent, or approval of the Department of General Services or any other state department or agency and are not required to comply with requirements under the State Contracting Manual or the Public Contract Code.

(c) (1) Any regulation, guideline, other standard adopted, or decision rendered, by the commission under this chapter is not a “project” for purposes of the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)). However, nothing in this section exempts any project undertaken pursuant to a regulation, guideline, other standard adopted, or decision rendered, pursuant to this chapter from
 the California Environmental Quality Act.

(2) This subdivision is declarative of existing law and shall apply to all regulations, guidelines, other standards adopted, or decisions rendered, under this chapter whether before or after the effective date of this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 6.   (AB 1 2x)   Effective January 13, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4.6. Petroleum Market [25370. - 25373.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [25370. - 25370.]

25370.

For purposes of this chapter and Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 25350), the following definitions apply:

(a) “Planned maintenance” means regular, periodic maintenance or repair of one or more pieces of equipment within a petroleum refinery that may require the shutdown of that equipment, or that may reduce production of a petroleum refinery.

(b) “Price spike” means a rate of increase of a refinery’s gross gasoline refining margin, as defined in Section 25355, that is greater than the rate of increase of the average price of crude oil received by the refinery, for the same period of time, or a rate of decrease of a refinery’s gross gasoline refining margin that is less than the rate of decrease
 of the average price of crude oil received by the refinery, for the same period of time.

(c) “Transportation fuels” means gasoline, gasoline blending components, diesel fuel, or renewable fuels.

(d) “Turnaround” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 7872 of the Labor Code.

(e) “Unplanned maintenance” means any maintenance or repair that requires the shutdown of any part of the petroleum refinery that will result in any reduction in production that was not scheduled as turnaround or planned maintenance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1, Sec. 10.   (SB 2 1x)   Effective June 26, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Transportation Fuels Assessment [25371. - 25371.4.]

25371.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, on or before January 1, 2024, and every three years thereafter, the commission shall submit an assessment to the Legislature, in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, and to the Governor that does all of the following:

(A) Identifies methods to ensure a reliable supply of affordable and safe transportation fuels in California. The assessment shall include estimates for the level of transportation fuels at the state level, and, to the extent feasible, at regional and local levels, and individual refineries if relevant, that should be held in reserve by refiners to prevent gasoline price spikes. The assessment shall consider all factors causing price fluctuations in
 retail gasoline prices when recommending adequate reserve levels. The commission shall consider all relevant evidence from any reasonably available source, including, but not limited to, information about imports, by amount, source, if known, and data received by the commission pursuant to existing laws, economic and business experts, and information from any local, state, and federal agencies. The commission shall transmit to the Legislature, in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, any proposals it deems appropriate for mandatory reserve levels and the terms of a program to implement reserve levels.

(B) Evaluates the price of transportation fuels, including branded and unbranded retail prices, alternate formulations of gasoline with lower carbon impact, and other products suitable for production from refineries in California. This evaluation shall consider the market demand for these products at 3-, 7-, 10-, and 20-year
 intervals from the date of the assessment and shall rely on the most recent transportation forecasting and assessment activities conducted pursuant to Section 25304. This evaluation shall include both of the following:

(i) An examination of whether branded fuel additives have any impact, and, if so, how much, on fuel efficiency and vehicle emissions.

(ii) An assessment of the presence and availability of retail outlets, including monitoring changes in availability of retail outlets that contribute to increasing retail prices in local and regional areas.

(C) Considers different levels of supply conditions and assesses the impact of potential refinery closures in California.

(D) Includes an analysis of the impacts on production of refinery planned
 maintenance, unplanned maintenance, and turnaround. The assessment shall evaluate ways to manage necessary maintenance among the various facilities that would protect the health and safety of employees and the public, and minimize the impact of maintenance-related production losses. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Industrial Relations and Division of Occupational Safety and Health shall disclose to the commission, upon request, any information the department and division have received under Section 7872 of the Labor Code to ensure all aspects of refinery safety are incorporated into the assessment. All information designated confidential shall be treated as confidential by the commission.

(E) Evaluates the utility and feasibility of alternative methods to maintain adequate supplies of transportation fuels, including delivery alternatives for fuel and components of refined fuel, such as delivery by rail, a publicly maintained
 strategic fuel reserve, and other solutions beyond the activities of refineries and petroleum market participants.

(F) Proposes solutions to mitigate any impacts described in the assessment. The solutions shall include an assessment of the employment impacts and the cost and cost-effectiveness of any proposal, including cost impacts to all impacted sectors, both public and private. The assessment shall include recommendations and alternatives.

(G) Beginning with the first assessment submitted after the effective date of this subparagraph, evaluates California’s future petroleum product and crude oil import needs and identifies steps that can be taken to ensure that marine infrastructure and port facilities will be adequate to accommodate the efficient movement of petroleum products to meet those needs. In preparing the evaluation pursuant to this subparagraph, the commission shall
 consult with the ports in California at which petroleum and refined transportation fuels are imported, tanker terminal operators at California ports, the State Lands Commission, the California Coastal Commission, and the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission and evaluate ways to maximize the use of existing infrastructure and minimize cumulative pollution burdens.

(H) Beginning with the first assessment submitted after the effective date of this subparagraph, evaluates the effects of state regulations on supplies of transportation fuels that the commission identifies may be causing supply constraints, or for which the commission believes alternative compliance pathways should be considered by state agencies to mitigate potential impacts on supply.

(I) In the first assessment
 submitted after the effective date of this subparagraph, evaluate the cost and supply impacts of allowing the sale of gasoline with alternative specifications from those in Subarticle 2 (commencing with Section 2260) of Article 1 of Chapter 5 of Division 3 of Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations to support a reliable and affordable supply of transportation fuels in California. If the evaluation finds that allowing the sale of gasoline with alternative specifications is likely to support a reliable and affordable supply of transportation fuels in California, the commission, in coordination with the State Air Resources Board, shall recommend a strategy to facilitate the sale of gasoline with those alternative specifications that, at a minimum, considers (i) a trigger mechanism for when the gasoline with those alternative specifications may be sold based on the conditions of the transportation fuels market, (ii) the existing variance process in Section 43013.2 of the Health and Safety code, and (iii)
 the use of a fee established pursuant to Section 43013.2 of the Health and Safety Code associated with the sale of gasoline with those alternative specifications to mitigate for any increase in emissions. 

(J) (i) In the first assessment submitted after the effective date of this subparagraph, evaluate the development of a westwide gasoline specification that could be used in a western region to include California and areas outside of the state as an alternative to the California-specific specification established under Subarticle 2 (commencing with Section 2260) of Article 1 of Chapter 5 of Division 3 of Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations to stabilize the petroleum market and petroleum prices in the western region, including California. The commission, in coordination with the State Air Resources Board, shall conduct outreach to the western states, including the States of Arizona,
 Nevada, Oregon, and Washington, in furtherance of this evaluation. 

(ii) The evaluation pursuant to this subparagraph shall assess the costs and benefits of each alternative specification, including economic impacts to the state and to consumers, labor impacts, public health impacts, and environmental impacts. In making this evaluation, the commission shall take into consideration the impacts of the state’s electrification efforts and the requirements of the federal Clean Air Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 7661 et seq.). The evaluation shall identify and recommend the alternative specification that would minimize the costs and maximize the benefits to the state. 

(2) The first assessment shall include the evaluation of oil and gas extraction and refining that the State Air Resources Board outlined in the most recent